Louisiana, session 2026, HB990.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4887(A), (B)(introductory paragraph), (C), (D), and
(E)(1)(introductory paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4887. Municipal powers; demand; sworn detailed statement Parishes,
municipalities, sewerage districts, and waterworks districts; privileges; sewer
and water service charges or user fees
A. The governing authority of a municipality Parishes, municipalities,
sewerage districts, and waterworks districts shall have a privilege against a
multifamily residential property for the amount of any unpaid service charge or user
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 990 ENROLLED
fee for sewage disposal or water system services the municipality provides that they
provide. The privilege shall apply only to multifamily residential property that uses
a master meter service agreement in which a single water meter or collection of
meters measures the total water or sewage services usage for the entire property or
multiple units within a development. For purposes of this Section, multifamily
residential property shall mean immovable property consisting of more than four
dwelling units occupied by persons other than the owner of the immovable property.
B. When an owner of a multifamily residential property with a master meter
service agreement fails to pay the service charge or user fee for the sewage disposal
or water system services, a municipal governing authority parish, municipality,
sewerage district, or waterworks district seeking to collect the past due amounts
owed shall make written demand by any of the following:
* * *
C.(1) The owner shall have thirty days after the written demand to deliver
payment for the amount owed to the municipal governing authority parish,
municipality, sewerage district, or waterworks district.
(2) The municipal governing authority parish, municipality, sewerage
district, or waterworks district shall apply any sums paid by the owner following
delivery of the written demand to the balance owed.
(3) After expiration of the thirty-day period, the municipal governing
authority parish, municipality, sewerage district, or waterworks district may file a
sworn detailed statement of privilege in accordance with this Section.
D. Upon the filing of a sworn detailed statement of privilege, the municipal
governing authority parish, municipality, sewerage district, or waterworks district
shall have a privilege upon the multifamily residential property. The privilege shall
secure unpaid service charges, user fees, together with interest thereon at the legal
interest rate from the date due.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 990 ENROLLED
E.(1) The sworn detailed statement of privilege shall be signed and verified
by a municipal official an official of the parish, municipality, sewerage district, or
waterworks district with knowledge of the unpaid service charges or user fees for
sewage disposal or water system services and filed for registry in the mortgage
records of the parish where the multifamily residential property is located. The
statement of privilege shall include all of the following:
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.